California statutes. Financial Code
(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 660, Sec. 10.)
-------------------------------------------

12301.1.

A licensee within 10 days after establishing a mobile unit, a branch office or agency location shall notify the commissioner in writing and shall furnish the commissioner with the name and address of each such branch office or agency location and the California state registration number or other identification of the mobile unit and the area in which it proposes to operate such mobile unit and such other information as the commissioner may require so that he may be continuously advised of every location at which checks, drafts, or money orders of the licensee are being sold or issued. Within five days after the termination of a mobile unit, a branch office or agency
 location a licensee shall inform the commissioner of the name and address of the branch office or agency location terminated and the California state registration number or other identification of the mobile unit terminated, together with a statement of the reasons for the termination.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1817.)
-------------------------------------------

12301.2.

A check, draft, or money order sold by a licensee shall be drawn on an account of a licensee maintained at a bank authorized to do business in the State of California.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 632.)
-------------------------------------------

12301.3.

A licensee shall not permit any officer, employee, or agent to sell any check, draft, or money order unless the signature of the person signing the same is on file with the bank on which the check, draft, or money order is drawn or the licensee shall have filed with the bank and the commissioner written authorization to said bank to pay any checks, drafts, or money orders presented for payment on a form of the licensee as described in the authorization except as to items as to which licensee has filed a stop payment notice with said bank.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 632.)
-------------------------------------------

12301.4.

A licensee shall terminate and cancel any agency immediately upon instruction from the commissioner and when it has been established (a) that the agent has refused to permit the examination of its books, accounts, records, and files; (b) that an examination has revealed a shortage in its accounts relating to the sale of checks; (c) that the agent after specific instruction to do so has failed to remit to the licensee or deposit in its trust account within the time specified in Section 12300.4 funds received from the sale of checks, drafts, money orders, or other commercial paper serving the same purpose or
 funds received for the purpose of paying bills, invoices, or accounts of an obligor; (d) that the agency has violated any provision of this chapter. No agency terminated and canceled by a licensee pursuant to or for the reasons set forth in this section shall be re-established by said licensee or established by any other licensee until after the written consent of the commissioner is given to the establishment or re-establishment of such agency. If the licensee or the agent requests a hearing with respect to such termination, the commissioner shall thereupon hold a hearing within 10 days after receiving such request. If the commissioner finds that the violations were purely technical and do not substantially affect the agent’s ability to perform his duties as such agent, or if the commissioner finds that such violations did not occur, the commissioner shall issue an order vacating his said notice to the licensee.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1817.)
-------------------------------------------

12301.5.

No agent of a licensee shall issue or cause to be issued any check, draft, or money order, or other commercial paper serving the same purpose which is drawn upon the trust account of a licensee without concurrently receiving in full, in cash, or by check, draft, or money order from a third party believed to be valid, the principal amount thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1817.)
-------------------------------------------

12302.

Whenever a licensee desires to change his place of business to a street address other than that designated in his license or desires to change the place or area of doing business in the case of a mobile unit, he shall give written notice to the commissioner of the desired change.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1953, Ch. 807.)
-------------------------------------------

12303.

Every licensee shall keep and use in his business books, accounts and records in accordance with good accounting practice and which will enable the commissioner to determine whether such licensee has violated the provisions of this division or the rules and regulations made by the commissioner. Every licensee shall preserve such books, accounts and records for at least four years after making the final entry on each transaction recorded therein. Such books, accounts and records shall be kept current, shall be maintained at the main office of the licensee and shall be available for inspection by the commissioner on demand during regular business hours.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to require any licensee to keep an individual record of each individual fee charged in each transaction but the licensee shall be required to keep a record of the total charges made for any accounting period.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1955, Ch. 339.)
-------------------------------------------

12304.

(a) Each licensee, except a special prorater, shall submit to the commissioner, at such licensee’s own expense, an audit report containing audited financial statements covering the calendar year or, if such licensee has an established fiscal year, then for such fiscal year, within 105 days after the close of each such calendar or fiscal year. At such time, each licensee shall also file such additional relevant information as the commissioner may require.

(b) Within 30 days after receipt of a request from the commissioner, a licensee or other person subject to this division shall submit to
 the commissioner, at such person’s own expense, an audit report containing audited financial statements covering the 12 calendar months next preceding the month of receipt of the request, or such other period as the commissioner may require. Unless the public interest shall otherwise require, the commissioner shall exempt a licensee from the provisions of subdivision (a) hereof, in whole or in part, if such licensee has complied with a request pursuant to this subdivision (b) for financial statements as of a date within the calendar or fiscal year for which such exemption is granted.

(c) A licensee whose license has been surrendered or revoked shall submit to the commissioner, at its own expense, on or before 105 days after the effective date of such surrender or revocation, a closing audit report containing audited financial statements as of such effective date for the 12 months ending with such effective date, or for such other period as the
 commissioner may specify. Such report shall include the information required by subdivision (a) of this section and other relevant information specified by the commissioner. A licensee who has complied with this subdivision is exempted from subdivision (a) hereof.

(d) The reports and financial statements referred to in subdivisions (a), (b), and (c) of this section shall include at least a balance sheet and a statement of income for the year ended on the balance sheet date together with such other relevant information as the commissioner may require, and shall be prepared in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles and shall be accompanied by a report, certificate or opinion of an independent certified public accountant or independent public accountant. The audits shall be conducted in accordance with generally accepted auditing standards and the rules and regulations of the commissioner.

(e) A licensee shall make other special reports to the commissioner as the commissioner may from time to time require.

(f) For good cause and upon written request, the commissioner may extend the time for compliance with subdivisions (a), (b) and (c) of this section.

(g) A licensee shall, when requested by the commissioner, for good cause, submit its unaudited financial statement, prepared in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles and consisting of at least a balance sheet and statement of income as of the date and for the period specified by the commissioner. The commissioner may require the submission of such reports on a monthly or other periodic basis.

(h) If the report, certificate or opinion of the independent accountant referred to
 in subdivision (d) hereof is in any way qualified, the commissioner may require the licensee to take such action as he deems appropriate to permit an independent accountant to remove such qualification from the report, certificate or opinion.

(i) The commissioner may reject any financial statement, report, certificate or opinion filed pursuant to this section by notifying the licensee or other person required to make such filing of its rejection and the cause thereof. Within 30 days after the receipt of such notice, the licensee or other person shall correct such deficiency, and the failure so to do shall be deemed a violation of this division. The commissioner shall retain a copy of all filings so rejected. 

(j) The commissioner may make rules and regulations specifying the form and content of the reports and financial statements referred to in this section, and may require that
 such reports and financial statements be verified by the licensee in such manner as he may prescribe.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 223.)
-------------------------------------------

12305.

For the purpose of discovering violations of this division the commissioner may at any time investigate the business and examine the books, accounts, records, and files used therein, of any licensee, of any agent, and of any person who the commissioner has reason to believe is engaging in the business defined in this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1817.)
-------------------------------------------

12306.

The cost of every examination of a licensee or other person subject to this division shall be paid to the commissioner by the licensee or person examined, and the commissioner may maintain an action for the recovery of these costs in any court of competent jurisdiction. In determining the cost of an examination, the commissioner may use the estimated average hourly cost for all persons performing examinations of licensees or other persons subject to this division for the fiscal year. For the purposes of this section only, no person other than a licensee shall be deemed to be a person subject to this division unless and until the person is determined to be
 a person subject to this division by an administrative hearing in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code or by a judicial hearing in any court of competent jurisdiction.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 946, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

12307.

The commissioner may require the attendance of witnesses and examine under oath all persons whose testimony he requires relative to any examination or investigation.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 364.)
-------------------------------------------

12307.1.

The commissioner may commence and prosecute actions and proceedings to enjoin violations of this division or violations of orders or decisions of the commissioner rendered pursuant to this division, and for the enforcement of any and all civil penalties provided for by this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 1031.)
-------------------------------------------

12307.2.

If the commissioner finds as a result of an examination or report that a licensee is insolvent or has been insolvent or is conducting or has conducted business in such an unsafe or injurious manner as to render its further operations hazardous to the public, the commissioner may forthwith by an order addressed to and served on the licensee by registered mail and on any other person having funds of the licensee or its customers in their possession, direct discontinuance of the disbursement of such funds and the further conduct of business by the licensee. The order shall be conditioned to remain in effect unless the commissioner fails to hold a hearing within 15 days after receipt of a written request by the licensee, until set aside by the commissioner in whole or in part, until the licensee is the subject of an order for relief in bankruptcy, or
 pursuant to a petition filed by the commissioner or other interested person a receiver has been appointed by a court of competent jurisdiction.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 188, Sec. 8.   (AB 2433)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

12307.3.

Whenever as a result of an examination or report it appears to the commissioner that:

(a) The capital of any licensee is impaired;

(b) Any licensee is conducting its business in such an unsafe or injurious manner as to render its further operations hazardous to the public;

(c) Any licensee has suspended payment of its trust obligations;

(d) Any licensee has refused to submit its books, papers, and affairs to the
 inspection of an examiner of the Division of Corporations;

(e) Any officer of any licensee refuses to be examined under oath touching the concerns of such licensee;

(f) Any licensee neglects or refuses to comply with any order of the commissioner made pursuant to this division unless the enforcement of such order is restrained in a proceeding brought by such licensee; the commissioner may forthwith take possession of the property and business of such licensee and retain possession until such licensee resumes business or its affairs be finally liquidated as herein provided. Such licensee, with the consent of the commissioner, may resume business upon such terms as he may prescribe.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1817.)
-------------------------------------------

12307.4.

Whenever the commissioner has taken possession of the property and business of a licensee the commissioner may petition the superior court for the appointment of a receiver to liquidate the affairs of the licensee. During the time that the commissioner retains possession of the property and business of a licensee the commissioner shall have the same powers and authority with reference to the licensee as are vested in the Commissioner of Financial Institutions with respect to banks pursuant to Chapter 17 (commencing with Section 3100) of Division 1 and the
 licensee shall likewise have the same rights to hearings and judicial review as are granted to banks. While in possession of the property and business of a check seller, a receiver shall have the same powers and authority as are vested in the Commissioner of Financial Institutions while in possession of the property and business of a bank.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1015, Sec. 50.   Effective September 30, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

12307.5.

(a) For any licensee, a disciplinary action taken by the State of California, another state, an agency of the federal government, or another country for an action substantially related to the activity regulated under this division may be grounds for disciplinary action by the commissioner. A certified copy of the record of the disciplinary action taken against the licensee by the State of California, other state, agency of the federal government, or other country shall be conclusive evidence of the events related therein.

(b) Nothing in this section shall preclude the commissioner from applying a specific statutory provision in this division providing for discipline against a licensee as a result of disciplinary action taken against a licensee by the State of California, another state, an agency of the federal government, or another country.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 473, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

12309.

(a) A schedule of the fees charged by a licensee shall be posted in a conspicuous place in the place of business of the licensee and its agents. A licensee and its agents shall not charge fees in excess of the posted fees.

(b) Each licensee and its agents shall prominently post on the premises of each office of the licensee and on the premises of each agent, a notice clearly stating that checks or money orders issued by the licensee or its agents are not insured by the federal
 government, the state government, or any other public or private entity. This notice shall be printed in English and in the same language principally used by the licensee or any agent of the licensee to advertise, solicit, or negotiate, either orally or in writing, with respect to the purchase of checks or money orders. The information required in this notice shall be clear, legible, and in letters not less than one-half inch in height. The notice shall be posted in a conspicuous location in the unobstructed view of the public within the premises. In those locations operated by an agent of the licensee, the agent, and not the licensee, shall be responsible for the failure to properly post the required notice.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 869, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

12310.

A licensee under this division shall not sell checks payable to bearer, to cash, or to the purchaser, but a licensee may sell a check in which the name of the payee is not designated in any way if the check does not exceed one hundred fifty dollars ($150) in amount.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1955, Ch. 774.)
-------------------------------------------

12311.

No licensee shall advertise, print, display, publish, distribute, or broadcast, or cause or permit to be advertised, printed, displayed, published, distributed, or broadcast, in any manner whatsoever, any statement or representation which is false, misleading, or deceptive, or which omits to state material information, or which refers to the supervision of such licensee by the State of California or any department or official thereof. The commissioner may order any licensee to desist from any conduct which he shall find to be a violation of the foregoing provisions.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 257.)
-------------------------------------------

12312.

An agreement between one licensed to engage in the business of selling checks, drafts, money orders, or other commercial paper serving the same purpose, and one undertaking to act in that business as an agent of the licensee, shall be in writing.

Such a licensee shall not pay such an agent any compensation as consideration for becoming an agent, other than that specified in their written agency agreement, in any manner, directly or indirectly, or by any method, practice or device whatsoever.

The commissioner may order any licensee to desist from any conduct which the
 commissioner shall find to be a violation of the foregoing provisions of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 660, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

12313.5.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed as authorizing the examination, inspection or auditing of the books and records of any client of a business agent while such books and records are in the possession of the business agent without the express consent of the client.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 498.)
-------------------------------------------

12314.

The total charges received by a prorater, or any other person for the prorater’s services, may not exceed in the aggregate twelve percent (12%) for the first three thousand dollars ($3,000), eleven percent (11%) for the next two thousand dollars ($2,000), and ten percent (10%) for any of the remaining payments distributed by a prorater to the creditors of a debtor, except for payments made on recurrent obligations. Recurring obligations shall be defined for the purpose of this section as follows: current rent payments, current utility payments, current telephone bills, current alimony payments, current monthly insurance premium payments, and payments made on obligations
 which are secured by a first mortgage or first deed of trust on real property.

(a) Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 12315, upon compliance with the provisions of Sections 12315.1, and 12320, an origination fee of a sum not to exceed fifty dollars ($50) may be charged;

(b) A fee not to exceed four dollars ($4) per disbursement on recurring obligations, consisting of current rent payments or obligations which are secured by a first mortgage or first trust deed on real property, may be charged.

(c) A fee not to exceed one dollar ($1) on other recurring obligations.

When a debtor has not canceled or defaulted on the performance of his contract with the prorater within 12 months after execution of the prorate contract, the prorater shall refund any origination fee
 charged to the debtor. At least once each month the prorater shall pay not less than 70 percent of all funds received from the debtor to the creditors of the debtor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1972, Ch. 999.)
-------------------------------------------

12314.1.

A cancellation fee or termination penalty may not be charged to a debtor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 999.)
-------------------------------------------

12315.

A prorater shall not receive any fee unless he has the consent of at least 51 percent of the total amount of indebtedness and of the number of creditors listed in the prorater’s contract with the debtor, or such like number of creditors have accepted a distribution of payment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 498.)
-------------------------------------------

12315.1.

A prorater shall notify, in writing, all creditors listed in the prorate contract of the debtors desire to engage the services of the prorater within five days of the effective date of the contract as defined in Section 12320. The notification shall include a notice as to the proposed monthly payment to be made to the creditor. Every contract between a prorater and a debtor shall list every debt to be prorated with the creditor’s name, and disclose the total of all such debts.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 999.)
-------------------------------------------

12316.

If a prorater contracts for, receives or makes any charge in excess of the maximum permitted by this division, except as the result of an accidental and bona fide error, the prorater’s contract with the debtor shall be void and the prorater shall return to the debtor all charges received from the debtor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 498.)
-------------------------------------------

12317.

A prorater shall not purchase from a creditor any obligation of a debtor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 498.)
-------------------------------------------

12318.

A prorater shall not take:

(a) Any contract, promise to pay, or other instrument which has any blank spaces when signed by a debtor;

(b) Any negotiable instrument for the prorater’s charges;

(c) Any note, wage assignment, real estate or chattel mortgage, or other security to secure the prorater’s charges;

(d) Any confession of judgment or power of attorney to confess judgment against the debtor or to appear for the
 debtor in a judicial proceeding.

(e) Concurrent with the signing of the contract or as part of the contract or as part of the application for the contract a release of any obligation to be performed on the part of the prorater.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 498.)
-------------------------------------------

12319.

Every contract between a prorater and a debtor shall:

(a) List every debt to be prorated with the creditor’s name and disclose the total of all such debts;

(b) Provide payments reasonably within the ability of the debtor to pay in precise terms;

(c) Disclose in precise terms the rate and amount of the prorater’s charge;

(d) Disclose the approximate number and amount of installments required to pay the debts in full;

(e) Disclose the name and address of the prorater and of the debtor;

(f) Contain such other provision or disclosures as the commissioner shall determine is necessary for the protection of the debtor and the proper conduct of business by a prorater.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 498.)
-------------------------------------------

12320.

A prorater shall deliver a copy of any contract or agreement between the prorater and a debtor to the debtor immediately after the debtor executes it, and the debtor’s copy shall be executed by the prorater. A contract shall not be effective until a debtor has made a payment to the prorater for distribution to his creditors.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 498.)
-------------------------------------------

12321.

Unless paid by check or money order a prorater shall deliver a receipt to a debtor for each payment within five (5) days after receipt of a payment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 498.)
-------------------------------------------

12322.

At least once in each six (6) months, the prorater shall render an accounting to the debtor which shall itemize the total amount received from the debtor, the total amount paid to each creditor, the total amount which any creditor has agreed to accept as payment in full on any debt owed him by the debtor, the amount of charges deducted, and any amount held in reserve. A prorater shall in addition render such an account to a debtor within seven days after written demand.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 498.)
-------------------------------------------

12323.

A prorater shall not lend money or credit.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 498.)
-------------------------------------------

12324.

A prorater shall not:

(a) Offer, pay, or give any cash, fee, gift, bonus, premium, reward, or other compensation to any person for referring any prospective customer to the prorater;

(b) Receive any cash, fee, gift, bonus, premium, reward, or other compensation from any person other than the debtor in connection with his activities as a prorater.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 498.)
-------------------------------------------

12325.

A prorater shall not solicit or require a debtor to purchase or agree to purchase any policy of insurance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 498.)
-------------------------------------------

12326.

A special prorater shall not advertise in any manner or otherwise hold himself out to the public as a general prorater or as qualified to do business as a general prorater unless he holds a valid unrevoked general proraters license.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 498.)
-------------------------------------------

12327.

Nothing in this division shall be deemed to authorize the performance, directly or indirectly, of an act or acts constituting the practice of law by a prorater, business agent, check seller, or by any person, firm, corporation or organization described, or engaging in a transaction specified in subdivision (a), (b), (d), (e), (f), (g), or (h) of Section 12100.

Without limiting the generality of the foregoing and other applicable laws, the following act or acts, when done by the owner, manager or employee of a prorater, in connection with a prorating transaction, shall be deemed to constitute the unlawful
 practice of law:

(a) Preparation, advising or signing of a release of attachment or garnishment, stipulation, affidavit for exemption, compromise agreement or other legal or court document;

(b) The furnishing of legal advice or performance of legal services of any kind.

No prorater (including an owner, manager or employee of a prorater) shall (1) represent that he or she is authorized or competent to furnish legal advice or perform legal services; (2) assume authority on behalf of creditors or a debtor or accept a power of attorney authorizing it to employ or terminate the services of an attorney or to arrange the terms of or compensate for such services; (3) communicate with the debtor or creditor or any other person in the name of an attorney or upon the stationery of an
 attorney or prepare any form or instrument which only attorneys are authorized to prepare.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 660, Sec. 12.)
-------------------------------------------

12328.

(a) No collection agency may be maintained in the same premises as a prorating organization unless such prorating organization is exempt under the provisions of this division.

(b) No prorater’s license shall be issued to a collection agency.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 498.)
-------------------------------------------

12329.

It shall be unlawful for any prorater to disclose the list of creditors of a debtor to any individual or firm for the purpose of soliciting the accounts and such disclosure shall be ground for revocation of license.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 498.)
-------------------------------------------

12330.

The commissioner shall have power and authority to promulgate rules and regulations governing the form and wording of advertising to be used by proraters. The issuance, distribution or placement of any advertising by a prorater which is in conflict with such rules and regulations shall be ground for the revocation of its license.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 498.)
-------------------------------------------

12331.

Within the organization of each prorater corporation, either as an owner, officer, or employee, there shall be one or more persons possessing a minimum of five years experience in consumer credit extension or credit collection activity. At least one such qualified person shall be stationed on duty at each business location during the time the location is open for business.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 1285.)
-------------------------------------------

12332.

(a) It is unlawful for any person to knowingly alter, destroy, mutilate, conceal, cover up, falsify, or make a false entry in any record, document, or tangible object with the intent to impede, obstruct, or influence the administration or enforcement of any provision of this division.

(b) It is unlawful for any person to knowingly make an untrue statement to the commissioner during the course of licensing, investigation, or examination, with the intent to impede, obstruct, or
 influence the administration or enforcement of any provision of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 101, Sec. 15.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 5. Revocation of Licenses [12400. - 12404.]

12400.

The commissioner may, upon reasonable opportunity to be heard, suspend or revoke any license issued pursuant to this division, if he finds that:

(a) The licensee has failed to report within 10 days the establishment of a mobile unit, branch office, or agency location, or has failed upon demand of the commissioner pursuant to Section 12301.4 of this code to terminate and cancel any agency.

(b) The licensee has violated any provision of this division or any rule or regulation made by the commissioner under and with the authority of this division.
 

(c) Any fact or condition exists which, if it had existed at the time of the original application for such license, reasonably would have warranted the commissioner in refusing originally to issue such license.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1968, Ch. 869.)
-------------------------------------------

12401.

The commissioner may upon three days’ notice and a hearing, suspend any license for a period not exceeding 30 days, pending investigation.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 364.)
-------------------------------------------

12401.1.

The commissioner may by order summarily suspend or revoke the license of a licensee who fails to pay the license fee prescribed by Section 12214 within 10 days after notice by the commissioner that such fee is due and payable. If, after such an order is made, a request for hearing is filed in writing and hearing is not held within 60 days thereafter, the order is rescinded as of its effective date.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1972, Ch. 644.)
-------------------------------------------

12402.

Except where a shorter time for setting the hearing is prescribed in this division, all hearings under this division shall be conducted in accordance with Chapter 5 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code and in all cases the commissioner shall have all the powers granted therein.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 364.)
-------------------------------------------

12403.

Every order, decision, license, or other official act of the commissioner is subject to review in accordance with law.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 364.)
-------------------------------------------

12404.

(a) The commissioner may, after appropriate notice and opportunity for hearing, by order, censure or suspend for a period not exceeding 12 months, or bar from any position of employment, management, or control any licensee, any nonprofit community service organization subject to Section 12104, or any other person, if the commissioner finds either of the following:

(1) That the censure, suspension, or bar is in the public interest and that the person has committed or caused a
 violation of this division or rule or order of the commissioner, which violation was either known or should have been known by the person committing or causing it or has caused material damage to the licensee, nonprofit community service organization, or to the public.

(2) That the person has been convicted of or pleaded nolo contendere to any crime, or has been held liable in any civil action by final judgment, or any administrative judgment by any public agency, if that crime or civil or administrative judgment involved any offense involving dishonesty, fraud, or deceit, or any other offense reasonably related to the qualifications, functions, or duties of a person engaged in the business in accordance with the provisions of this division.

(b) Within 15 days from the date of a notice of intention to issue an order pursuant to subdivision (a), the person may request a hearing
 under the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 11400) of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code). Upon receipt of a request, the matter shall be set for hearing to commence within 30 days after such receipt unless the person subject to this division consents to a later date. If no hearing is requested within 15 days after the mailing or service of such notice and none is ordered by the commissioner, the failure to request a hearing shall constitute a waiver of the right to a hearing.

(c) Upon receipt of a notice of intention to issue an order pursuant to this section, the person who is the subject of the proposed order is immediately prohibited from engaging in any activities subject to licensure or exempt from licensure under Section 12104 of the law.

(d) Persons suspended or barred under this section are prohibited from participating in any
 business activity of a licensee or a person exempt from licensure under Section 12104 and from engaging in any business activity on the premises where a licensee or a person exempt from licensure under Section 12104 is conducting business.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 101, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 4. AUTOMATED TELLER MACHINES: USER SAFETY [13000. - 13070.]



CHAPTER 1. Intent [13000. - 13000.]

13000.

It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this division to enhance the safety of consumers using automated teller machines in California without discouraging the siting of automated teller machines in locations convenient to consumers’ homes and workplaces. Since decisions concerning safety at automated teller machine sites are inherently subjective and because safety is a relative matter, the Legislature intends to establish as the standard of care applicable to operators of automated teller machines, in connection with user safety, the substantial compliance with the objective standards of Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 13040), the information
 requirements of Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 13050), and the good faith consideration of other safety issues as prescribed in Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 13030). The Legislature further recognizes the need for uniformity as to the establishment of automated teller machine safety standards and intends with this division to supersede and preempt any rule, regulation, code, statute, or ordinance of any city, county, city and county, municipality, or local agency regarding customer safety at automated teller machines in California.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 825, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2. Definitions [13020. - 13020.]

13020.

As used in this division:

(a) “Access area” means any paved walkway or sidewalk which is within 50 feet of an automated teller machine. The term does not include publicly maintained sidewalks or roads, as defined in Section 555 or Section 527 of the Vehicle Code.

(b) “Access device” shall have the same meaning as set forth in Federal Reserve Board Regulation E (12 C.F.R. Part 205), promulgated pursuant to the Electronic Fund Transfer Act (15 U.S.C. 1601 et seq.).

(c) “Automated teller machine” means any electronic information processing device located in California which accepts or dispenses cash in connection with a credit, deposit, or convenience account. The term does not include devices used solely to facilitate check guarantees or check authorizations, or which are used in connection with the acceptance or dispensing of cash on a person-to-person basis, such as by a store cashier.

(d) “Candlefoot power” means the light intensity of candles on a horizontal plane at 36 inches above ground level and five feet in front of the area to be measured.

(e) “Control” of an access area or defined parking area means to have the present authority to determine how, when, and by whom it is to be used, and how it is to be maintained, lighted, and landscaped.

(f) “Customer”
 means a natural person to whom an access device has been issued for personal, family, or household use.

(g) “Defined parking area” means that portion of any parking area open for customer parking which is (1) contiguous to an access area with respect to an automated teller machine; (2) regularly, principally, and lawfully used for parking by users of the automated teller machine while conducting automated teller machine transactions during hours of darkness; and (3) owned or leased by the operator of the automated teller machine or owned or controlled by the party leasing the automated teller machine site to the operator. The term does not include any parking area which is not open or regularly used for parking by users of the automated teller machine who are conducting automated teller machine transactions during hours of darkness. A parking area is not open if it is physically closed to access or if conspicuous signs indicate that it is